Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,228
Local law; applicability.

(1) Nothing in the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act shall:

(a) Preempt any local law;

(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, otherwise affect any local law or the authority of any local government to adopt or enforce any local law; and

(c) Affect or modify in any way the obligations or liabilities of any person under other state or federal law.

(2) Any local law enacted after September 13, 1997, which requires the submission of a material safety data sheet from facility owners or operators shall require that the data sheet be identical in content and format to the data sheet required under section 81-15,223. In addition, a locality may require the submission of information which is supplemental to the information required on the data sheet, including information on the location and quantity of hazardous chemicals present at the facility, through additional sheets attached to the data sheet or such other means as the locality considers appropriate.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 38.